Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1512
Department; emergency powers.

Nothing in the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act shall be construed to limit any power which the Governor or any other officer may have to declare an emergency and act on the basis of such declaration if such power is conferred by statute or constitutional provision or inheres in the office.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 12;

Laws 1987, LB 152, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 88;

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 28.

Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, see section 13-2001.

Livestock Waste Management Act, see section 54-2416.